Hawaii statutes.
§666-12 How writ executed. The officer
to whom the writ for delivering possession is directed and delivered shall
execute the same according to the tenor thereof. [CC 1859, §944; RL 1925,
§2785; RL 1935, §4022; RL 1945, §10411; RL 1955, §240-12; HRS §666-12]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next